New Jersey, session 221, A4736.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 2 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-14) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: Deceptive audio or visual media means any video recording, motion picture film, sound recording, electronic image, photograph, any technological representation of speech or conduct substantially derivative thereof, or any forgery or facsimile of a document or writing, that appears to a reasonable person to realistically depict any speech, conduct, or writing of a person who did not in fact engage in the speech, conduct, or writing, and the production of which was substantially dependent upon technical means, rather than the ability of another person to physically or verbally impersonate the person; "Electronic communication" means a communication transmitted by means of an electronic device, including, but not limited to, a telephone, cellular phone, computer, or pager; "Harassment, intimidation or bullying" means any gesture, any written, verbal or physical act, [or] any electronic communication, or any act or communication, including electronic communication, that uses deceptive audio or visual media, whether it be a single incident or a series of incidents, that is reasonably perceived as being motivated either by any actual or perceived characteristic, such as race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, or a mental, physical or sensory disability, or by any other distinguishing characteristic, that takes place on school property, at any school-sponsored function, on a school bus, or off school grounds as provided for in section 16 of P.L.2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-15.3), that substantially disrupts or interferes with the orderly operation of the school or the rights of other students, teachers, or staff members and that: a.     a reasonable person should know, under the circumstances, will have the effect of physically or emotionally harming a student, teacher, or staff member or damaging the [student's] property of a student, teacher, or staff member, or placing a student, teacher, or staff member in reasonable fear of physical or emotional harm to [his] the person of the student, teacher, or staff member or damage to [his] the property of the student, teacher, or staff member; b.    has the effect of insulting or demeaning any student, teacher, staff member, or group [of students] thereof; or c.     creates a hostile educational environment for the student, teacher, or staff member by interfering with [a student's] that persons education or career or by severely or pervasively causing physical or emotional harm to the student, teacher, or staff member. (cf: P.L.2010, c.122, s.11) 2.  Section 3 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-15) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  Each school district shall adopt a policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation or bullying on school property, at a school-sponsored function or on a school bus. The school district shall adopt the policy through a process that includes representation of parents or guardians, school employees, volunteers, students, administrators, and community representatives. b.    A school district shall have local control over the content of the policy, except that the policy shall contain, at a minimum, the following components: (1) a statement prohibiting harassment, intimidation or bullying of a student, teacher, or staff member; (2) a definition of harassment, intimidation or bullying no less inclusive than that set forth in section 2 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-14); (3) a description of the type of behavior expected from each student; (4) consequences and appropriate remedial action for a person who commits an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying.  The consequences for a student who commits an act of harassment, intimidation, or bullying may include: for the first act of harassment, intimidation, or bullying committed by a student, a copy of the results of the investigation shall be placed in the student's record and the student may be subject to remedial actions, including the provision of counseling or behavioral intervention services, or discipline, or both, as determined by the principal in consultation with appropriate school staff; for the second act, a copy of the results of the investigation shall be placed in the student's record and the student may be subject to remedial actions, including the provision of counseling or behavioral intervention services, or discipline, or both, as determined by the principal, in consultation with appropriate school staff; and for the third and each subsequent act, a copy of the results of the investigation shall be placed in the student's record, and the principal, in consultation with appropriate school staff, shall develop an individual student intervention plan which shall be approved by the superintendent of schools or the superintendent's designee, and may include remedial actions including counseling or behavioral intervention services, or progressive discipline, or both, and may require the student, accompanied by a parent or guardian, to complete in a satisfactory manner a class or training program to reduce harassment, intimidation or bullying behavior. The superintendent of schools or the superintendent's designee and the principal shall consult law enforcement, as appropriate, pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform State Memorandum of Agreement Between Education and Law Enforcement Officials, if the student's behavior may constitute a possible violation of the New Jersey Code of Criminal Justice; (5)  a procedure for reporting an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying, including a provision that permits a person to report an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying anonymously; however, this shall not be construed to permit formal disciplinary action solely on the basis of an anonymous report. All acts of harassment, intimidation, or bullying shall be reported verbally to the school principal on the same day when the school employee or contracted service provider witnessed or received reliable information regarding any such incident.  The principal shall inform the parents or guardians of all students involved in the alleged incident, and may discuss, as appropriate, the availability of counseling and other intervention services.  The principal shall keep a written record of the date, time, and manner of notification to the parents or guardians.  All acts of harassment, intimidation, or bullying shall be reported in writing to the school principal within two school days of when the school employee or contracted service provider witnessed or received reliable information that a student had been subject to harassment, intimidation, or bullying.  The written report shall be on a numbered form developed by the Department of Education.  A copy of the form shall be submitted promptly by the principal to the superintendent of schools.  The form shall be completed even if a preliminary determination is made under the school district's policy that the reported incident or complaint is a report outside the scope of the definition of harassment, intimidation, or bullying pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-14), and shall be kept on file at the school but shall not be included in any student record, unless the incident results in disciplinary action or is otherwise required to be contained in a student's record under State or federal law.  A redacted copy of the form that removes all student identification information shall be confidentially shared with the board of education after the conclusion of the investigation, if a hearing is requested by a parent or guardian pursuant to subparagraph (d) of paragraph (6) of this subsection. The school district shall provide a means for a parent or guardian to complete an online numbered form developed by the Department of Education to confidentially report an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying. The school district shall provide a means for a teacher or staff member to report an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying by one or more students against that teacher or staff member. The principal shall report to the superintendent if a preliminary determination is made under the school district's policy that the reported incident or complaint is a report outside the scope of the definition of harassment, intimidation, or bullying, and the superintendent may require the principal to conduct an investigation of the incident, if the superintendent determines that an investigation is necessary because the incident is within the scope of the definition of harassment, intimidation, or bullying.  The superintendent shall notify the principal of this determination in writing; (6) a procedure for prompt investigation of reports of violations and complaints, which procedure shall at a minimum provide that: (a) the investigation shall be initiated by the principal or the principal's designee within one school day of the report of the incident and shall be conducted by a school anti-bullying specialist.  The principal may appoint additional personnel who are not school anti-bullying specialists to assist in the investigation.  The investigation shall be completed as soon as possible, but not later than 10 school days from the date of the written report of the incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying or from the date of the written notification from the superintendent to the principal to initiate an investigation pursuant to paragraph (5) of this subsection.  In the event that there is information relative to the investigation that is anticipated but not yet received by the end of the 10-day period, the school anti-bullying specialist may amend the original report of the results of the investigation to reflect the information; (b) the results of the investigation shall be reported to the superintendent of schools within two school days of the completion of the investigation, and in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the superintendent may decide to provide intervention services, establish training programs to reduce harassment, intimidation, or bullying and enhance school climate, impose discipline, order counseling as a result of the findings of the investigation, or take or recommend other appropriate action including seeking further information; (c) the results of each investigation shall be reported to the board of education no later than the date of the board of education meeting next following the completion of the investigation, along with information on any services provided, training established, discipline imposed, or other action taken or recommended by the superintendent; (d) parents or guardians of the students who are parties to the investigation, or any teachers or staff members who are parties to the investigation,  shall be entitled to receive information about the investigation, in accordance with federal and State law and regulation, including the nature of the investigation, whether the district found evidence of harassment, intimidation, or bullying, or whether discipline was imposed or services provided to address the incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying.  This information shall be provided in writing within [5] five school days after the results of the investigation are reported to the board. A parent or guardian, teacher, or staff member may request a hearing before the board after receiving the information, and the hearing shall be held within 10 days of the request.  The board shall meet in executive session for the hearing to protect the confidentiality of the students, teachers, or staff members.  At the hearing the board may hear from the school anti-bullying specialist about the incident, recommendations for discipline or services, and any programs instituted to reduce such incidents; (e) at the next board of education meeting following its receipt of the report pursuant to subparagraph (c) of paragraph (6) of this subsection, the board shall issue a decision, in writing, to affirm, reject, or modify the superintendent's decision.   The board's decision may be appealed to the Commissioner of Education, in accordance with the procedures set forth in law and regulation, no later than 90 days after the issuance of the board's decision; and (f) a parent, student, guardian, teacher, staff member, or organization may file a complaint with the Division on Civil Rights within 180 days of the occurrence of any incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying based on membership in a protected group as enumerated in the "Law Against Discrimination," P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.); (7) the range of ways in which a school will respond once an incident of harassment, intimidation or bullying is identified, which shall be defined by the principal in conjunction with the school anti-bullying specialist, but shall include an appropriate combination of services that are available within the district such as counseling, support services, intervention services, and other programs, as defined by the commissioner.  In the event that the necessary programs and services are not available within the district, the district may apply to the Department of Education for a grant from the "Bullying Prevention Fund" established pursuant to section 25 of P.L.2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-28) to support the provision of out-of-district programs and services; (8) a statement that prohibits reprisal or retaliation against any person who reports an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying and the consequence and appropriate remedial action for a person who engages in reprisal or retaliation; (9) consequences and appropriate remedial action for a person found to have falsely accused another as a means of retaliation or as a means of harassment, intimidation or bullying; (10) a statement of how the policy is to be publicized, including notice that the policy applies to participation in school-sponsored functions; (11) a requirement that a link to the policy be prominently posted on the home page of the school district's website and distributed annually to parents and guardians who have children enrolled in a school in the school district; (12) a requirement that the name, school phone number, school address and school email address of the district anti-bullying coordinator be listed on the home page of the school district's website and that on the home page of each school's website the name, school phone number, school address and school email address of the school anti-bullying specialist and the district anti-bullying coordinator be listed. The information concerning the district anti-bullying coordinator and the school anti-bullying specialists shall also be maintained on the department's website; and (13) a requirement that the school district and each school in the district with a website post on its homepage the current version of the document, Guidance for Parents on the Anti-Bullying Bill of Rights Act, developed by the Department of Education. The School Climate State Coordinator shall ensure that this document is updated as needed and then promptly disseminated to all school districts. c.     A school district shall adopt a policy and transmit a copy of its policy to the appropriate executive county superintendent of schools by September 1, 2003.  A school district shall annually conduct a re-evaluation, reassessment, and review of its policy, making any necessary revisions and additions.  The board shall include input from the school anti-bullying specialists in conducting its re-evaluation, reassessment, and review.  The district shall transmit a copy of the revised policy to the appropriate executive county superintendent of schools within 30 school days of the revision.  The first revised policy following the effective date of P.L.2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-13.1 et al.) shall be transmitted to the executive county superintendent of schools by September 1, 2011. d.  (1) To assist school districts in developing policies for the prevention of harassment, intimidation, or bullying, the Commissioner of Education shall develop a model policy applicable to grades kindergarten through 12.  This model policy shall be issued no later than December 1, 2002. (2) The commissioner shall adopt amendments to the model policy which reflect the provisions of P.L.2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-13.1 et al.) no later than 90 days after the effective date of that act and shall subsequently update the model policy as the commissioner deems necessary. e.     Notice of the school district's policy shall appear in any publication of the school district that sets forth the comprehensive rules, procedures and standards of conduct for schools within the school district, and in any student handbook. f.     Nothing in this section shall prohibit a school district from adopting a policy that includes components that are more stringent than the components set forth in this section. (cf: P.L.2021, c.338, s.3) 3.  Section 4 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-16) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  A member of a board of education, school employee, student or volunteer shall not engage in reprisal, retaliation or false accusation against a victim, witness or one with reliable information about an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying. b.    A member of a board of education, school employee, contracted service provider, student or volunteer who has witnessed, or has reliable information that a student, teacher, or staff member has been subject to, harassment, intimidation or bullying shall report the incident to the appropriate school official designated by the school district's policy, or to any school administrator or safe schools resource officer, who shall immediately initiate the school district's procedures concerning school bullying. c.     A member of a board of education or a school employee who promptly reports an incident of harassment, intimidation or bullying, to the appropriate school official designated by the school district's policy, or to any school administrator or safe schools resource officer, and who makes this report in compliance with the procedures in the district's policy, is immune from a cause of action for damages arising from any failure to remedy the reported incident. d.    A school administrator who receives a report of harassment, intimidation, or bullying from a district employee, and fails to initiate or conduct an investigation, or who should have known of an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying and fails to take sufficient action to minimize or eliminate the harassment, intimidation, or bullying, may be subject to disciplinary action. (cf: P.L.2010, c.122, s.13) 4.  Section 17 of P.L.2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-20) is amended to read as follows: 17.  a.  The principal in each school in a school district shall appoint a school anti-bullying specialist. When a school guidance counselor, school psychologist, or another individual similarly trained is currently employed in the school, the principal shall appoint that individual to be the school anti-bullying specialist.  If no individual meeting this criteria is currently employed in the school, the principal shall appoint a school anti-bullying specialist from currently employed school personnel.  The school anti-bullying specialist shall: (1)   chair the school safety team as provided in section 18 of P.L.2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-21); (2)   lead the investigation of incidents of harassment, intimidation, and bullying in the school; and (3)   act as the primary school official responsible for preventing, identifying, and addressing incidents of harassment, intimidation, and bullying in the school. b.    The superintendent of schools shall appoint a district anti-bullying coordinator.  The superintendent shall make every effort to appoint an employee of the school district to this position.  The district anti-bullying coordinator shall: (1)   be responsible for coordinating and strengthening the school district's policies to prevent, identify, and address harassment, intimidation, and bullying [of students]; (2)   collaborate with school anti-bullying specialists in the district, the board of education, and the superintendent of schools to prevent, identify, and respond to harassment, intimidation, and bullying [of students] in the district; (3)   provide data, in collaboration with the superintendent of schools, to the Department of Education regarding harassment, intimidation, and bullying [of students]; and (4)   execute such other duties related to school harassment, intimidation, and bullying as requested by the superintendent of schools. c.     The district anti-bullying coordinator shall meet at least twice a school year with the school anti-bullying specialists in the district to discuss and strengthen procedures and policies to prevent, identify, and address harassment, intimidation, and bullying in the district. (cf: P.L.2010, c.122, s.17) 5.  Section 18 of P.L. 2010, c.122 (C.18A:37-21) is amended to read as follows: 18.  a.  A school district shall form a school safety team in each school in the district to develop, foster, and maintain a positive school climate by focusing on the on-going, systemic process and practices in the school and to address school climate issues such as harassment, intimidation, or bullying.  A school safety team shall meet at least two times per school year. b.    A school safety team shall consist of the principal or his designee who, if possible, shall be a senior administrator in the school and the following appointees of the principal: a teacher in the school; a school anti-bullying specialist; a parent of a student in the school; and other members to be determined by the principal.  The school anti-bullying specialist shall serve as the chair of the school safety team. c.     The school safety team shall: (1)   receive any complaints of harassment, intimidation, or bullying of students, teachers, or staff members that have been reported to the principal; (2)   receive copies of any report prepared after an investigation of an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying; (3)   identify and address patterns of harassment, intimidation, or bullying [of students] in the school; (4)   review and strengthen school climate and the policies of the school in order to prevent and address harassment, intimidation, or bullying [of students]; (5)   educate the community, including students, teachers, administrative staff, and parents, to prevent and address harassment, intimidation, or bullying [of students]; (6)   participate in the training required pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-13 et seq.) and other training which the principal or the district anti-bullying coordinator may request; (7)   collaborate with the district anti-bullying coordinator in the collection of district-wide data and in the development of district policies to prevent and address harassment, intimidation, or bullying [of students]; and (8)   execute such other duties related to harassment, intimidation, and bullying as requested by the principal or district anti-bullying coordinator. d.    The members of a school safety team shall be provided professional development opportunities that address effective practices of successful school climate programs or approaches. e.     Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a parent, teacher, or staff member who is a member of the school safety team shall not participate in the activities of the team set forth in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection c. of this section or any other activities of the team which may compromise the confidentiality of a student, teacher, or staff member. (cf: P.L.2010, c.122, s.18) 6.  This act shall take effect immediately.